Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 2
QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this article was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of this article for 1980 and 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For election offenses relating to qualifications and registration of electors, see part 2 of article 13 of this title.

Section

PART 1 QUALIFICATIONS OF ELECTORS

PART 2 REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

PART 3 MASTER LIST OF ELECTORS

PART 4 HIGH SCHOOL REGISTRATION

PART 5 MAIL REGISTRATION AND
REGISTRATION AT VOTER
REGISTRATION AGENCIES

PART 6 CANCELLATION OF REGISTRATION

PART 7 VOTER REGISTRATION DRIVES